District of Columbia statutes.
10-511.01

Tunnel under Capitol Grounds and Botanic Garden grounds — Required.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed, in constructing, maintaining, and operating a vehicular tunnel in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, extending from the vicinity of 2nd and C Streets Southwest, to the vicinity of 3rd and Constitution Avenue Northwest, as a part of the Innerloop Freeway System, to locate a portion of such tunnel under square W-576, which is a part of the United States Botanic Garden grounds, and reservation 12, which is a part of the United States Capitol Grounds.

July 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 333, Pub. L. 88-381, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 9-135.
1973 Ed., § 9-139.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government